Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.901

Effective date—2016 c 241.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 3, 2016].

[ 2016 c 241 s 302.]